California statutes. Penal Code
 the parole period shall be deemed to have commenced on the date of release from the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(5) Paragraph (4) applies to persons released by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation on or after January 1, 2012. Persons released by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation prior to January 1, 2012, shall continue to be subject to the law governing the tolling of parole in effect on December 31, 2011.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in Article 3 (commencing with Section 3040) of this chapter, the following shall apply to any inmate subject to Section 3000.08:

(1) In the case of an inmate sentenced under Section 1168 for a crime committed prior to July 1, 2013, the period of parole shall not exceed five years in the case of an inmate imprisoned for
 any offense other than first or second degree murder for which the inmate has received a life sentence, and shall not exceed three years in the case of any other inmate, unless in either case the Board of Parole Hearings for good cause waives parole and discharges the inmate from custody of the department. This subdivision shall also be applicable to inmates who committed crimes prior to July 1, 1977, to the extent specified in Section 1170.2. In the case of any inmate sentenced under Section 1168 for a crime committed on or after July 1, 2013, the period of parole shall not exceed five years in the case of an inmate imprisoned for any offense other than first or second degree murder for which the inmate has received a life sentence, and shall not exceed three years in the case of any other inmate, unless in either case the department for good cause waives parole and discharges the inmate from custody of the department.

(2) (A) For a crime committed prior to July 1, 2013, at the expiration of a term of imprisonment of 1 year and one day, or a term of imprisonment imposed pursuant to Section 1170 or at the expiration of a term reduced pursuant to Section 2931 or 2933, if applicable, the inmate shall be released on parole for a period not exceeding 3 years, except that any inmate sentenced for an offense specified in paragraph (3), (4), (5), (6), (11), or (18) of subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 shall be released on parole for a period not exceeding 10 years, unless a longer period of parole is specified in Section 3000.1.

(B) For a crime committed on or after July 1, 2013, at the expiration of a term of imprisonment of 1 year and one day, or a term of imprisonment imposed pursuant to Section 1170 or at the expiration of a term reduced pursuant to Section 2931 or 2933, if applicable, the inmate shall be released on parole for a period of 3 years, except
 that any inmate sentenced for an offense specified in paragraph (3), (4), (5), (6), (11), or (18) of subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 shall be released on parole for a period of 10 years, unless a longer period of parole is specified in Section 3000.1.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), in the case of any offense for which the inmate has received a life sentence pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 209, with the intent to commit a specified sex offense, or Section 667.51, 667.61, or 667.71, the period of parole shall be 10 years, unless a longer period of parole is specified in Section 3000.1.

(4) (A) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, in the case of a person convicted of and required to register as a sex offender for the commission of an offense specified in Section 261, 264.1, 286, 287, paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section
 288, Section 288.5 or 289, or former Section 262 or 288a, in which one or more of the victims of the offense was a child under 14 years of age, the period of parole shall be 20 years and six months unless the board, for good cause, determines that the person will be retained on parole. The board shall make a written record of this determination and transmit a copy of it to the parolee.

(B) In the event of a retention on parole, the parolee shall be entitled to a review by the board each year thereafter.

(C) There shall be a board hearing consistent with the procedures set forth in Sections 3041.5 and 3041.7 within 12 months of the date of any revocation of parole to consider the release of the inmate on parole, and notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 3041.5, there shall be annual parole consideration hearings thereafter, unless the person
 is released or otherwise ineligible for parole release. The panel or board shall release the person within one year of the date of the revocation unless it determines that the circumstances and gravity of the parole violation are such that consideration of the public safety requires a more lengthy period of incarceration or unless there is a new prison commitment following a conviction.

(D) The provisions of Section 3042 shall not apply to any hearing held pursuant to this subdivision.

(5) (A) The Board of Parole Hearings shall consider the request of any inmate whose commitment offense occurred prior to July 1, 2013, regarding the length of parole and the conditions thereof.

(B) For an inmate whose commitment offense occurred on or after July 1, 2013, except for those inmates described in
 Section 3000.1, the department shall consider the request of the inmate regarding the length of parole and the conditions thereof. For those inmates described in Section 3000.1, the Board of Parole Hearings shall consider the request of the inmate regarding the length of parole and the conditions thereof.

(6) Upon successful completion of parole, or at the end of the maximum statutory period of parole specified for the inmate under paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4), as the case may be, whichever is earlier, the inmate shall be discharged from custody. The date of the maximum statutory period of parole under this subdivision and paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4) shall be computed from the date of initial parole and shall be a period chronologically determined. Time during which parole is suspended because the prisoner has absconded or has been returned to custody as a parole violator shall not be credited toward any period of parole unless the
 prisoner is found not guilty of the parole violation. However, the period of parole is subject to the following:

(A) Except as provided in Section 3064, in no case may a prisoner subject to three years on parole be retained under parole supervision or in custody for a period longer than four years from the date of the initial parole.

(B) Except as provided in Section 3064, in no case may a prisoner subject to five years on parole be retained under parole supervision or in custody for a period longer than seven years from the date of the initial parole.

(C) Except as provided in Section 3064, in no case may a prisoner subject to 10 years on parole be retained under parole supervision or in custody for a period longer than 15 years from the date of the initial parole.

(7) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall meet with each inmate at least 30 days prior to the inmate’s good time release date and shall provide, under guidelines specified by the parole authority or the department, whichever is applicable, the conditions of parole and the length of parole up to the maximum period of time provided by law. The inmate has the right to reconsideration of the length of parole and conditions thereof by the department or the parole authority, whichever is applicable. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or the board may impose as a condition of parole that a prisoner make payments on the prisoner’s outstanding restitution fines or orders imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 13967 of the Government Code, as operative prior to September 28, 1994, or subdivision (b) or (f) of Section 1202.4.

(8) For purposes of this chapter, and except as otherwise described in
 this section, the board shall be considered the parole authority.

(9) (A) On and after July 1, 2013, the sole authority to issue warrants for the return to actual custody of any state prisoner released on parole rests with the court pursuant to Section 1203.2, except for any escaped state prisoner or any state prisoner released prior to the prisoner’s scheduled release date who should be returned to custody, and Section 5054.1 shall apply.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), any warrant issued by the Board of Parole Hearings prior to July 1, 2013, shall remain in full force and effect until the warrant is served or it is recalled by the board. All prisoners on parole arrested pursuant to a warrant issued by the board shall be subject to a review by the board prior to the department filing a petition with the court to revoke the parole of the
 petitioner.

(10) It is the intent of the Legislature that efforts be made with respect to persons who are subject to Section 290.011 who are on parole to engage them in treatment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 59.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3000.01.

(a) This section applies to persons released from state prison on or after July 1, 2020, and who are subject to the jurisdiction of, and parole supervision by, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation pursuant to Section 3000.08 of the Penal Code.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (d) and notwithstanding any other law, persons described in subdivision (a) shall serve a parole term as follows:

(1) Any inmate sentenced to a determinate term shall be released on parole for a period of two years. The inmate will be reviewed by the Division of Adult Parole Operations for possible discharge from
 parole no later than 12 months after release from confinement. If at the time of the review the inmate has been on parole continuously for 12 months since release from confinement without a violation and the inmate is not a person required to be treated as described in Section 2962, the inmate shall be discharged from parole.

(2) Any inmate sentenced to a life term shall be released on parole for a period of three years. The inmate will be reviewed by the Division of Adult Parole Operations and referred to the Board of Parole Hearings for possible discharge from parole no later than 12 months after release from confinement. If the Board of Parole Hearings determines the inmate should be retained on parole, the inmate will be reviewed again and referred to the Board of Parole Hearings for possible discharge from parole no later than 24 months after
 release from confinement.

(c) Upon successful completion of parole, or at the end of the maximum statutory period of parole specified in this section, whichever is earlier, the inmate shall be discharged from parole. The date of the maximum statutory period of parole under this section shall be computed from the date of initial parole and shall be a period chronologically determined. Time during which parole is suspended because the inmate has been returned to custody as a parole violator shall not be credited toward any period of parole unless the inmate is found not guilty of the parole violation.

(1) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 3000 and Section 3064, in no case may an inmate who is released on parole for a period of two years be retained under parole
 supervision or in custody for a period longer than three years from the date of their initial parole.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 3000 and Section 3064, in no case may an inmate who is released on parole for a period of three years be retained under parole supervision or in custody for a period longer than four years from the date of their initial parole.

(d) This section shall not apply to any of the following inmates:

(1) An inmate currently incarcerated for an offense that will require the person to register as a sex offender pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 290) of Title 9 of Part 1.

(2) Inmates whose
 parole term at the time of the commission of the offense was less than the parole term prescribed in subdivision (b).

(e) The parole review periods specified in subdivision (b) shall not apply to inmates whose review period at the time of the commission of the offense provides for an earlier review period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 29, Sec. 18.   (SB 118)   Effective August 6, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3000.02.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the California MAT Re-Entry Incentive Program.

(b) A person shall be eligible for a 30-day reduction to the period of parole for every six months of treatment that is not ordered by the court, up to a maximum 90-day reduction, if the person meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The person has been released from state prison and is subject to the jurisdiction of, and parole supervision by, the department pursuant to Section 3000.08.

(2) The person has been enrolled in, or successfully participated in,
 a post-release
 substance abuse program.

(3) The person successfully participates in a substance abuse treatment program that employs a multifaceted approach to treatment, including the use of United States Food and Drug Administration approved medically assisted therapy (MAT), and, whenever possible, is provided through a program licensed or certified by the State Department of Health Care Services, including federally qualified health centers (FQHS), community clinics, and Native American Health Centers.

(c) The sentence reduction shall be contingent upon successful participation in treatment, as determined by the treatment provider.

(d) This section shall not apply to inmates that are any of the following:

(1) Sentenced for an offense specified in
 paragraph (3), (4), (5), (6), (11), or (18) of subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.

(2) Convicted of an offense for which the inmate has received a life sentence pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 209, with the intent to commit a specified sex offense, or Section 667.51 , 667.61, or 667.71.

(3) Convicted of, and required to register as a sex offender for the commission of, an offense specified in Section 261, 262, 264.1, 286, or 287, paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 288, Section 288.5 or 289, or former Section 288a, in which one or more of the victims of the offense was a child under 14 years of age.

(e) (1) Operation of this section is contingent upon the appropriation to the State Department of Health Care Services of funds received pursuant to a federal Substance Abuse and Mental
 Health Services Administration (SAMHSA) opioid use disorder or substance use disorder grant. To the extent consistent with the terms of the grant, the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) of the grant funds appropriated for these purposes shall be allocated to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation for use in implementing this section.

(2) The department shall collect data and analyze utilization and program outcomes and shall provide that information in the report required pursuant to Section 2694.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 59, Sec. 1.   (AB 644)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3000.03.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall not return to prison, place a parole hold on pursuant to Section 3056, or report any parole violation to the Board of Parole Hearings or the court, as applicable, regarding any person to whom all of the following criteria apply:

(a) The person is not required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 290) of Title 9 of Part 1.

(b) The person was not committed to prison for a serious felony as defined in Sections 1192.7 and 1192.8, or a violent felony, as defined in Section 667.5, and does not have a prior conviction for a serious felony, as
 defined in Section 1192.7 and 1192.8, or a violent felony, as defined in Section 667.5.

(c) The person was not committed to prison for a sexually violent offense as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6600 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and does not have a prior conviction for a sexually violent offense as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6600 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) The person was not found guilty of a serious disciplinary offense, as defined in regulation by the department, during his or her current term of imprisonment.

(e) The person is not a validated prison gang member or associate, as defined in regulation by the department.

(f) The person did not refuse to sign any forms, or provide any samples, as required by
 Section 3060.5.

(g) The person was evaluated by the department using a validated risk assessment tool and was not determined to pose a high risk to reoffend.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 34.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3000.05.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may contract with a private debt collection agency or with the Franchise Tax Board, whichever is more cost-effective, to make collections, on behalf of a victim, from any person who is or has been under the jurisdiction of the department and who has failed to make restitution payments according to the terms and conditions specified by the department.

(b) If a debt is referred to a private debt collection agency or to the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section, the debtor shall be given notice of that fact, either by the department or the private debt collection agency in writing to his or
 her address of record, or by his or her parole officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 105.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3000.07.

(a) Every inmate who has been convicted for any felony violation of a “registerable sex offense” described in subdivision (c) of Section 290 or any attempt to commit any of the above-mentioned offenses and who is committed to prison and released on parole pursuant to Section 3000 or 3000.1 shall be monitored by a global positioning system for the term of his or her parole, or for the duration or any remaining part thereof, whichever period of time is less.

(b) Any inmate released on parole pursuant to this section shall be required to pay for the costs associated with the monitoring by a global positioning system. However, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall waive any or all of that payment upon a finding of an inability to pay. The department shall consider any remaining amounts the inmate has been ordered to pay in fines, assessments and restitution fines, fees, and orders, and shall give priority to the payment of those items before requiring that the inmate pay for the global positioning monitoring. No inmate shall be denied parole on the basis of his or her inability to pay for those monitoring costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 579, Sec. 45.   Effective October 13, 2007.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

3000.08.

(a) A person released from state prison prior to or on or after July 1, 2013, after serving a prison term, or whose sentence has been deemed served pursuant to Section 2900.5, for any of the following crimes is subject to parole supervision by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the jurisdiction of the court in the county in which the parolee is released, resides, or in which an alleged violation of supervision has occurred, for the purpose of hearing petitions to revoke parole and impose a term of custody:

(1) A serious felony as described in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7.

(2) A violent felony as described in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.

(3) A crime for which the person was sentenced pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 667 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 1170.12.

(4) Any crime for which the person is classified as a high-risk sex offender.

(5) Any crime for which the person is required, as a condition of parole, to undergo treatment by the State Department of State Hospitals pursuant to Section 2962.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, all other offenders released from prison shall be placed on postrelease supervision pursuant to Title 2.05 (commencing with Section 3450).

(c) At any time during the period of parole of a person subject to this section, if any parole agent or peace officer has
 probable cause to believe that the parolee is violating any term or condition of his or her parole, the agent or officer may, without warrant or other process and at any time until the final disposition of the case, arrest the person and bring him or her before the court, or the court may, in its discretion, issue a warrant for that person’s arrest pursuant to Section 1203.2. Notwithstanding Section 3056, and unless the parolee is otherwise serving a period of flash incarceration, whenever a supervised person who is subject to this section is arrested, with or without a warrant or the filing of a petition for revocation as described in subdivision (f), the court may order the release of the parolee from custody under any terms and conditions the court deems appropriate.

(d) Upon review of the alleged violation and a finding of good cause that the parolee has committed a violation of law or violated his or her conditions of parole, the
 supervising parole agency may impose additional and appropriate conditions of supervision, including rehabilitation and treatment services and appropriate incentives for compliance, and impose immediate, structured, and intermediate sanctions for parole violations, including flash incarceration in a city or a county jail. Periods of “flash incarceration,” as defined in subdivision (e) are encouraged as one method of punishment for violations of a parolee’s conditions of parole. This section does not preclude referrals to a reentry court pursuant to Section 3015.

(e) “Flash incarceration” is a period of detention in a city or a county jail due to a violation of a parolee’s conditions of parole. The length of the detention period can range between one and 10 consecutive days. Shorter, but if necessary more frequent, periods of detention for violations of a parolee’s conditions of parole shall appropriately punish a parolee while preventing the
 disruption in a work or home establishment that typically arises from longer periods of detention.

(f) If the supervising parole agency has determined, following application of its assessment processes, that intermediate sanctions up to and including flash incarceration are not appropriate, the supervising parole agency shall, pursuant to Section 1203.2, petition either the court in the county in which the parolee is being supervised or the court in the county in which the alleged violation of supervision occurred, to revoke parole. At any point during the process initiated pursuant to this section, a parolee may waive, in writing, his or her right to counsel, admit the parole violation, waive a court hearing, and accept the proposed parole modification or revocation. The petition shall include a written report that contains additional information regarding the petition, including the relevant terms and conditions of parole, the circumstances
 of the alleged underlying violation, the history and background of the parolee, and any recommendations. The Judicial Council shall adopt forms and rules of court to establish uniform statewide procedures to implement this subdivision, including the minimum contents of supervision agency reports. Upon a finding that the person has violated the conditions of parole, the court shall have authority to do any of the following:

(1) Return the person to parole supervision with modifications of conditions, if appropriate, including a period of incarceration in a county jail.

(2) Revoke parole and order the person to confinement in a county jail.

(3) Refer the person to a reentry court pursuant to Section 3015 or other evidence-based program in the court’s discretion.

(g) Confinement pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (f) shall not exceed a period of 180 days in a county jail.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, if Section 3000.1 or paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 3000 applies to a person who is on parole and the court determines that the person has committed a violation of law or violated his or her conditions of parole, the person on parole shall be remanded to the custody of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the jurisdiction of the Board of Parole Hearings for the purpose of future parole consideration.

(i) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any of the following persons released from state prison shall be subject to the jurisdiction of, and parole supervision by, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation for a period of parole up to
 three years or the parole term the person was subject to at the time of the commission of the offense, whichever is greater:

(1) The person is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 290) of Title 9 of Part 1, and was subject to a period of parole exceeding three years at the time he or she committed a felony for which they were convicted and subsequently sentenced to state prison.

(2) The person was subject to parole for life pursuant to Section 3000.1 at the time of the commission of the offense that resulted in a conviction and state prison sentence.

(j) Parolees subject to this section who have a pending adjudication for a parole violation on July 1, 2013, are subject to the jurisdiction of the Board of Parole Hearings. Parole revocation proceedings conducted by the
 Board of Parole Hearings prior to July 1, 2013, if reopened on or after July 1, 2013, are subject to the jurisdiction of the Board of Parole Hearings.

(k) Except as described in subdivision (c), any person who is convicted of a felony that requires community supervision and who still has a period of state parole to serve shall discharge from state parole at the time of release to community supervision.

(l) Any person released to parole supervision pursuant to subdivision (a) shall, regardless of any subsequent determination that the person should have been released pursuant to subdivision (b), remain subject to subdivision (a) after having served 60 days under supervision pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 236.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3000.09.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, any parolee who was paroled from state prison prior to October 1, 2011, shall be subject to this section.

(b) Parolees subject to this section shall remain under supervision by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation until one of the following occurs:

(1) Jurisdiction over the person is terminated by operation of law.

(2) The supervising agent recommends to the Board of Parole Hearings that the offender be discharged and the parole authority approves the discharge.

(3) The offender is
 subject to a period of parole of up to three years pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 3000 and was not imprisoned for committing a violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, a serious felony, as defined by subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, or is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290, and completes six consecutive months of parole without violating their conditions, at which time the supervising agent shall review and make a recommendation on whether to discharge the offender to the Board of Parole Hearings and the Board of Parole Hearings approves the discharge.

(c) Parolees subject to this section who are being held for a parole violation in state prison on October 1, 2011, upon completion of a revocation term on or after November 1, 2011, shall either remain under parole supervision of the department pursuant to Section 3000.08 or shall be placed on postrelease community
 supervision pursuant to Title 2.05 (commencing with Section 3450). Any person placed on postrelease community supervision pursuant to Title 2.05 (commencing with Section 3450) after serving a term for a parole revocation pursuant to this subdivision shall serve a period of postrelease supervision that is no longer than the time period for which the person would have served if the person remained on parole. Notwithstanding Section 3000.08, any parolee who is in a county jail serving a term of parole revocation or being held pursuant to Section 3056 on October 1, 2011, and is released directly from county jail without returning to a state facility on or after October 1, 2011, shall remain under the parole supervision of the department. Any parolee that is pending final adjudication of a parole revocation charge prior to October 1, whether located in county jail or state prison, may be returned to state prison and shall be confined pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 3057. Any subsequent
 parole revocations of a parolee on postrelease community supervision shall be served in county jail pursuant to Section 3056.

(d) Any parolee who was paroled prior to October 1, 2011, who commits a violation of parole shall, until July 1, 2013, be subject to parole revocation procedures in accordance with the rules and regulations of the department consistent with Division 2 of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations. On and after July 1, 2013, any parolee who was paroled prior to October 1, 2011, shall be subject to the procedures established under Section 3000.08.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 36.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

3000.1.

(a) (1) In the case of any inmate sentenced under Section 1168 for any offense of first or second degree murder with a maximum term of life imprisonment, the period of parole, if parole is granted, shall be the remainder of the inmate’s life.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, in the case of any inmate sentenced to a life term under subdivision (b) of Section 209, if that offense was committed with the intent to commit a specified sexual offense, Section 269 or 288.7, subdivision (c) of Section 667.51, Section 667.71 in which one or more of the victims of the offense was a child under 14 years of age, or subdivision (j), (l), or (m) of Section 667.61, the period of parole, if parole is granted, shall
 be the remainder of the inmate’s life.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, when any person referred to in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) has been released on parole from the state prison, and has been on parole continuously for seven years in the case of any person imprisoned for first degree murder, and five years in the case of any person imprisoned for second degree murder, since release from confinement, the board shall, within 30 days, discharge that person from parole, unless the board, for good cause, determines that the person will be retained on parole. The board shall make a written record of its determination and transmit a copy of it to the parolee.

(c) In the event of a retention on parole pursuant to subdivision (b), the parolee shall be entitled to a review by the board each year thereafter.

(d) There
 shall be a hearing as provided in Sections 3041.5 and 3041.7 within 12 months of the date of any revocation of parole of a person referred to in subdivision (a) to consider the release of the inmate on parole and, notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 3041.5, there shall be annual parole consideration hearings thereafter, unless the person is released or otherwise ineligible for parole release. The panel or board shall release the person within one year of the date of the revocation unless it determines that the circumstances and gravity of the parole violation are such that consideration of the public safety requires a more lengthy period of incarceration or unless there is a new prison commitment following a conviction.

(e) The provisions of Section 3042 shall not apply to any hearing held pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 280, Sec. 2.   (AB 1438)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

3001.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when any person referred to in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 3000 who was not imprisoned for committing a violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, not imprisoned for a serious felony, as defined by subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, or is not required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290, has been released on parole from the state prison, and has been on parole continuously for six months since release from confinement, within 30 days, that person shall be discharged from parole, unless the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation recommends to the Board of Parole Hearings that the person be retained on parole and the board, for good cause, determines that
 the person will be retained.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when any person referred to in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 3000 who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to the Sex Offender Registration Act or who was imprisoned for committing a serious felony described in either subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 or subdivision (a) of Section 1192.8, has been released on parole from the state prison, and has been on parole continuously for one year since release from confinement, within 30 days, that person shall be discharged from parole, unless the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation recommends to the Board of Parole Hearings that the person be retained on parole and the board, for good cause, determines that the person will be retained.

 (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when any person referred to in paragraph
 (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 3000 who was imprisoned for committing a violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, has been released on parole from the state prison for a period not exceeding three years and has been on parole continuously for two years since release from confinement, or has been released on parole from the state prison for a period not exceeding five years and has been on parole continuously for three years since release from confinement, the department shall discharge, within 30 days, that person from parole, unless the department recommends to the board that the person be retained on parole and the board, for good cause, determines that the person will be retained. The board shall make a written record of its determination and the department shall transmit a copy thereof to the parolee.

(4) This subdivision shall apply only to those persons whose commitment offense occurred prior to the effective date
 of the act adding this paragraph.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when any person referred to in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 3000, with the exception of persons described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 3000.1, has been released on parole from the state prison, and has been on parole continuously for three years since release from confinement, the board shall discharge, within 30 days, the person from parole, unless the board, for good cause, determines that the person will be retained on parole. The board shall make a written record of its determination and the department shall transmit a copy of that determination to the parolee.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when any person referred to in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 3000 has been released on parole from the state prison, and has been on parole
 continuously for six years and six months since release from confinement, the board shall discharge, within 30 days, the person from parole, unless the board, for good cause, determines that the person will be retained on parole. The board shall make a written record of its determination and the department shall transmit a copy thereof to the parolee.

(d) In the event of a retention on parole, the parolee shall be entitled to a review by the Board of Parole Hearings each year thereafter until the maximum statutory period of parole has expired.

(e) The amendments to this section made during the 1987–88 Regular Session of the Legislature shall only be applied prospectively and shall not extend the parole period for any person whose eligibility for discharge from parole was fixed as of the effective date of those amendments.

(f) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall, within 60 days from the date that the act adding this subdivision is effective, submit to the Board of Parole Hearings recommendations pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) for any person described in that paragraph who has been released from state prison from October 1, 2010, to the effective date of this subdivision, and who has been on parole continuously for one year since his or her release from confinement. A person who meets the criteria in this subdivision who are not retained on parole by the Board of Parole Hearings by the 91st day after the effective date of this subdivision shall be discharged from parole.

 (g) The amendments made to subdivision (a) during the 2011–12 Regular Session and the First Extraordinary Session of the Legislature shall apply prospectively from October 1, 2011, and no person on parole prior to October 1, 2011, shall be discharged
 from parole pursuant to subdivision (a) unless one of the following circumstances exist:

(1) The person has been on parole continuously for six consecutive months after October 1, 2011, and the person is not retained by the Board of Parole Hearings for good cause.

(2) The person has, on or after October 1, 2011, been on parole for one year and the Board of Parole Hearings does not retain the person for good cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 43, Sec. 38.   (SB 1023)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Note: This section was amended on Nov. 7, 2006, by initiative Prop. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

3002.

In considering the imposition of conditions of parole upon a prisoner convicted of violating any section of this code in which a minor is a victim of an act of abuse or neglect, the Department of Corrections shall provide for a psychological evaluation to be performed on the prisoner to determine the extent of counseling which may be mandated as a condition of parole. Such examination may be performed by psychiatrists, psychologists, or licensed clinical social workers.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 3001 by Stats. 1978, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

3003.
